Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2902
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Uniform Motor Vehicle Records Disclosure Act is to implement the federal Driver's Privacy Protection Act of 1994, Title XXX of Public Law 103-322, in order to protect the interest of individuals in their personal privacy by prohibiting the disclosure and use of personal information contained in their motor vehicle records except as authorized by such individuals or by law.

Laws 1997, LB 635, § 2.